Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5164HH (5) 91 sb/js H.F. 2379 Section 1. Section 724.4B, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . i. A person who holds a valid permit to 3 carry weapons issued under this chapter and who for any lawful 4 purpose carries a firearm on or about the personâs body, while 5 the firearm remains continuously under the personâs control. 6